New Jersey, session 222, A4517.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or a successor agency. Compliance cost means the cost borne by a customer while attempting to comply with the requirements of any State law, rule, regulation, or order concerning energy policy, including, but not limited to, the Energy Master Plan.  Compliance cost includes, but is not limited to, the cost of purchasing and installing new appliances or equipment; permitting and other inspection fees; upgrading existing appliances; and making infrastructure improvements, including, but not limited to, wiring upgrades, electrical panel upgrades, and other structural changes associated with upgrading electric public utility service from pole to residence. Compliance cost does not include the cost of energy supply. Customer means a residential or commercial customer of a public utility. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined pursuant to R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Energy Master Plan means the 2024 New Jersey Energy Master Plan prepared pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1977, c.146 (C.52:27F-14), or any successor plan. Orsted means Ørsted A/S, Orsted North America Inc., Orsted Wind Power North America LLC, Ocean Wind LLC, and Ocean Wind II, LLC. Public utility means the same as that term is defined pursuant to R.S.48:2-13. b.    (1) Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the board shall pay for any compliance costs incurred by a customer of a public utility. (2)   The board shall fund compliance cost payments required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection through uncommitted monies from: (a)   the revenue collections of the societal benefits charge, established pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60); (b)   the Global Warming Solutions Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-50); and (c)   the settlement agreement with Orsted entered into as of May 25, 2024, as received by the State. (3)   If the amount of compliance cost payments required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection exceeds the amount of uncommitted monies from the revenue sources outlined in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the board shall fund such excess payments from any appropriations made by the Legislature from the General Fund. c.     The board may, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.